Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2820
Writ; person detaining; how designated.

The person having the custody of the prisoner may, in all writs of habeas corpus issued under sections 29-2801 to 29-2824, be designated by his name of office, if he has any, or by his own name; or if both such names are unknown or uncertain, he may be described by an assumed appellation, and any person who is served with the writ shall be deemed the person intended thereby.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 369, p. 808;

R.S.1913, § 9266;

C.S.1922, § 10295;

C.S.1929, § 29-2820;

R.S.1943, § 29-2820.